Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB328.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9 of the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 9. Permit issuance and conditions.* * *(c) If the department issues an emergency permit, approval or authorization for stream clearing or maintenance activities around a water obstruction under this act or any other State law, the department shall authorize clearing activities for not less than 250 feet from the water obstruction if the emergency permit, approval or authorization is requested by a Commonwealth 1234567891011121314151617181920 agency or political subdivision and there is a declaration of disaster emergency for the area at the Federal, State or county level.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0328PN0283 - 2 - 1234